tests/ky-verbsopt.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../tr-ky.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ky-tr.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] Basic optatives":
    бол<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : болоюн
    бол<v><iv><opt><p2><sg> : болгун
    бол<v><iv><opt><p2><frm><sg> : болгула
    бол<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : болсун
    бол<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : бололу
    бол<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : бололук
    бол<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : болойлу
    бол<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : болойлук
    бол<v><iv><opt><p2><pl> : болгула
    бол<v><iv><opt><p2><frm><pl> : болгула
    бол<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : болсун
 
  "[lexc] Basic optatives with front vowels":
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : бөлөйүн
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p2><sg> : бөлгүн
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p2><frm><sg> : бөлгүлө
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : бөлсүн
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : бөлөлү
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : бөлөлүк
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : бөлөйлү
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : бөлөйлүк
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p2><pl> : бөлгүлө
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p2><frm><pl> : бөлгүлө
    бөл<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : бөлсүн

  "[twol] Optatives after vowels":
    аарчы<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : аарчыйын
    аарчы<v><iv><opt><p2><sg> : аарчыгын
    аарчы<v><iv><opt><p2><frm><sg> : аарчыгыла
    аарчы<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : аарчысын
    аарчы<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : аарчыйлы
    аарчы<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : аарчыйлык
    аарчы<v><iv><opt><p2><pl> : аарчыгыла
    аарчы<v><iv><opt><p2><frm><pl> : аарчыгыла
    аарчы<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : аарчысын
 
  "[twol] Optatives after rounded vowels":
    оку<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : окуюн
    оку<v><iv><opt><p2><sg> : окугун
    оку<v><iv><opt><p2><frm><sg> : окугула
    оку<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : окусун
    оку<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : окуйлу
    оку<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : окуйлук
    оку<v><iv><opt><p2><pl> : окугула
    оку<v><iv><opt><p2><frm><pl> : окугула
    оку<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : окусун
 
